District of Columbia statutes.
8-2201

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Animal Care and Control Agency” means the agency established by § 8-1802.

(2)

“Department” means the District Department of the Environment.

(3)

“Director” means the Director of the District Department of the Environment.

(4)

“Licensed wildlife rehabilitator” means a wildlife rehabilitator licensed in any state or the District.

(5)

“Wildlife” shall include any free-roaming wild animal, but shall not include:

(A)

Domestic animals;

(B)

Commensal rodents;

(C)

Invertebrates; and

(D)

Fish.

(6)

“Wildlife control” means to harass, repel, evict, exclude, possess, transport, liberate, reunite, rehome, take, euthanize, or kill wildlife.

(7)

“Wildlife control operator” means a person who is licensed to perform wildlife control services under § 8-2204, but shall not include the Animal Care and Control Agency or a property manager as defined by § 47-2853.141.

(8)

“Wildlife control services provider” means the operator of a business which involves the charging of a fee for services in wildlife control.

History

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-289, § 2, 57 DCR 11499
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008, 61 DCR 9990

Editor's Notes

Former § 8-2201 has been recodified as § 8-2031.